Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5864.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 4.15
AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECT BLOOD DONATIONS
23-4.15-1. Autologous or direct blood donations -- Requirements.
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Autologous blood donation" means when a person donates the person's own blood for
personal use during a future medical procedure.
(2) "Direct blood donation" means when a person donates the person's blood specifically
for the use of another person during the other person's future medical procedure.
(b) A hospital or other healthcare facility licensed under this title 23 shall allow a person
on whom a medical procedure is to be performed at the facility to donate a healthcare
provider‑ordered autologous or direct blood donation before the medical procedure if the facility
performs blood donations.
(c) A blood bank that facilitates autologous or direct blood donations shall comply with a
healthcare provider's order prescribing an autologous or direct blood donation for a person, unless
the person donating blood is in ill health, has a heart condition that makes donating blood
inadvisable, the person weighs too little to donate blood, or the person cannot or should not donate

blood for any other reason.
(d) A blood bank may charge not more than their regular fee to facilitate an autologous or
direct blood donation ordered by a healthcare provider under subsection (c) of this section. The
blood bank may charge a fee to store the donated blood until it is used by the person meant to
receive it.
(e) The department of health shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to
implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002061
========
LC002061 - Page 2 of 3